North Carolina statutes. Chapter 88B. Cosmetic Art.
§ 88B-22.
Licenses required; criminal penalty.

Except as provided in this Chapter, no person may practice or attempt to practice cosmetic art for pay or reward in any form, either directly or indirectly, without being licensed as an apprentice, cosmetologist, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist by the Board.

Except as provided in this Chapter, no person may practice cosmetic art or any part of cosmetic art, for pay or reward in any form, either directly or indirectly, outside of a licensed cosmetic art shop.

No person may open or operate a cosmetic art shop in this State unless a license has been issued by the Board for that shop.

An individual licensed as an esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist may practice only that part of cosmetic art for which the individual is licensed.

(d1)

No person may teach cosmetic art in a Board-approved cosmetic art school unless the person is a teacher licensed under this Chapter. A guest lecturer may be exempt from the requirements of this subsection upon approval by the Board.

An apprentice licensed under the provisions of this Chapter shall apprentice under the direct supervision of a cosmetologist. An apprentice shall not operate a cosmetic art shop.

A violation of this Chapter is a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1933, c. 179, ss. 1, 11, 28; 1949, c. 505, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 1481, ss. 1, 2; 1975, c. 7; c. 857, ss. 1, 8; 1977, cc. 155, 472; 1981, c. 614, s. 2; c. 615, ss. 1, 2, 17; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 990; 1985, c. 125; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 833; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 965; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1013, s. 3; 1993, c. 22, s. 2; c. 54, s. 1; c. 539, s. 608; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 605, s. 15; 1998-230, s. 2; 2006-212, s. 4; 2009-521, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-212, s. 4, effective August 8, 2006, added subsection (d1).

Session Laws 2009-521, s. 10, effective July 1, 2010, and applicable to acts occurring on or after that date, inserted “natural hair care specialist” in subsections (a) and (d) and made a related stylistic change.

§ 88B-23.
Licenses to be posted.

Every apprentice, cosmetologist, esthetician, manicurist, natural hair care specialist, and teacher licensed under this Chapter shall display the certificate of license issued by the Board within the shop in which the person works.

Every certificate of license to operate a cosmetic art shop or school shall be conspicuously posted in the shop or school for which it is issued.

History.

1933, c. 179, s. 24; 1998-230, s. 2; 2009-521, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-521, s. 11, effective July 1, 2010, and applicable to acts occurring on or after that date, inserted “natural hair care specialist” in subsection (a).

§ 88B-24.
Revocation of licenses and other disciplinary measures.

The Board may restrict, suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate any license for any of the following:

Conviction of a felony shown by certified copy of the record of the court of conviction.

Gross malpractice or gross incompetency as determined by the Board.

Advertising by means of knowingly false or deceptive statements.

Permitting any individual to practice cosmetic art without a license or temporary employment permit, with an expired license or temporary employment permit, or with an invalid license or temporary employment permit.

Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license for money or other thing of value other than the required fee or by fraudulent misrepresentation.

Practicing or attempting to practice by fraudulent misrepresentation.

Willful failure to display a certificate of license as required by

G.S. 88B-23

.

Willful violation of the rules adopted by the Board.

Violation of

G.S. 86A-15

by a cosmetologist, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist licensed by the Board and practicing cosmetic art in a barber shop.

History.

1933, c. 179, ss. 23, 26, 28; 1935, c. 54, s. 5; 1941, c. 234, s. 4; 1949, c. 505, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 857, ss. 8, 9; 1981, c. 614, ss. 1, 2; c. 615, ss. 14, 15, 17; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1013, ss. 2, 3; 1993, c. 539, 608; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 605, s. 16; 1998-230, s. 2; 2009-521, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-521, s. 12, effective July 1, 2010, and applicable to acts occurring on or after that date, inserted “natural hair care specialist” in subdivision (9).

§ 88B-25.
Exemptions.

The following persons are exempt from the provisions of this Chapter while engaged in the proper discharge of their professional duties:

Undertakers and funeral establishments licensed under G.S. 90-210.25.

Persons authorized to practice medicine or surgery under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.

Nurses licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.

Commissioned medical or surgical officers of the United States Army, Air Force, Navy, Marine, or Coast Guard.

A person employed in a cosmetic art shop to shampoo hair.

History.

1933, c. 179, ss. 1, 22; 1973, c. 1481, ss. 1, 2; 1975, c. 7; c. 857, s. 1; 1977, cc. 155, 472; 1981, c. 615, ss. 1, 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 990; 1985, c. 125; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 833; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 965; 1993, c. 22, s. 2; c. 54, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 605, s. 15; 1998-230, s. 2.

§ 88B-26.
Rules to be posted.

The Board shall furnish a copy of its rules relating to sanitary management of cosmetic art shops and cosmetic art schools to each shop and school licensed by the Board. Each shop and school shall post the rules in a conspicuous place.

The Board shall furnish a copy of its rules relating to curriculum and schools to each licensed cosmetic art school. Each cosmetic art school shall make these rules available to all teachers and students.

History.

1933, c. 179, s. 23; 1935, c. 54, s. 5; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 857, s. 9; 1981, c. 614, s. 1; c. 615, s. 14; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 605, s. 16; 1998-230, s. 2.

§ 88B-27.
Inspections.

Any inspector or other authorized representative of the Board may enter any cosmetic art shop or school to inspect it for compliance with this Chapter and the Board’s rules. All persons practicing cosmetic art in a shop or school shall, upon request, present satisfactory proof of identification. Satisfactory proof shall be in the form of a photographic driver’s license or photographic identification card issued by any state, federal, or other government entity. The Board may require a cosmetic art shop or school to be inspected as a condition for license renewal.

History.

1933, c. 179, ss. 15, 23; 1935, c. 54, ss. 3, 5; 1941, c. 234, s. 2; 1943, c. 354, s. 2; 1957, c. 1184, s. 2; 1971, c. 355, ss. 2, 3; c. 616, ss. 1, 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 1360, s. 2; 1975, c. 857, ss. 4, 9; 1981, c. 614, s. 1; c. 615, ss. 11, 14; 1983, c. 913, s. 9; 1989, c. 650, s. 2; 1995 (reg. Sess., 1996), c. 605, s. 16; 1998-230, s. 2.

§ 88B-28.
Restraining orders.

The Board, the Department of Health and Human Services, or any county or district health director may apply to the superior court for an injunction to restrain any person from violating the provisions of this Chapter or the Board’s rules. Actions under this section shall be brought in the county where the defendant resides or maintains his or her principal place of business or where the alleged acts occurred.

History.

1949, c. 505, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 857, s. 10; 1981, c. 614, s. 3; c. 615, s. 18; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1997-502, s. 8; 1998-230, s. 2.

§ 88B-29.
Civil penalties.

Authority to Assess Civil Penalties. — In addition to taking any of the actions permitted under

G.S. 88B-24

, the Board may assess a civil penalty not in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the violation of any section of this Chapter or the violation of any rules adopted by the Board. The clear proceeds of any civil penalty assessed under this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Consideration Factors. — Before imposing and assessing a civil penalty and fixing the amount thereof, the Board shall, as a part of its deliberations, take into consideration the following factors:

The nature, gravity, and persistence of the particular violation.

The appropriateness of the imposition of a civil penalty when considered alone or in combination with other punishment.

Whether the violation was willful and malicious.

Any other factors that would tend to mitigate or aggravate the violations found to exist.

Schedule of Civil Penalties. — The Board shall establish a schedule of civil penalties for violations of this Chapter. The schedule shall indicate for each type of violation whether the violation can be corrected. Penalties shall be assessed for the first, second, and third violations of specified sections of this Chapter and for specified rules.

Costs. — The Board may in a disciplinary proceeding charge costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, to the licensee against whom the proceedings were brought.

History.

1998-230, s. 2; 2004-142, s. 2.

§ 88B-999.

Table of Comparable Sections for
Chapters 88 and 88B

Prepared by Legislative Services Office

tablenum=“=table24” align=“left”> =c1 88-17
. . . . .
=c2 88B-4(a), 88B-5(b) =c2 88B-18(b), (c) =c1 88-18
. . . . .
None =c1 88-19
. . . . .
=c2 88B-13(a), (b) =c1 88-20
. . . . .
=c2 None =c1 88-21
. . . . .
=c2 88B-20, 88B-21 =c1 88-22 =c2 88B-25(1)-(4) =c1 88-23(a)(1)
. . . . .
=c2 88B-4, 88B-16, 88B-24, =c2 88B-26, 88B-27 =c1
(a)(2)
. . . . .
=c2 None =c1
(b)
. . . . .
=c2 88B-3(g), (h) =c1 88-23.1
. . . . .
=c2 88B-17 =c1 88-24
. . . . .
=c2 88B-23 =c1 88-25
. . . . .
=c2 88B-21 =c1 88-26
. . . . .
=c2 88B-24 =c1 88-27
. . . . .
=c2 None =c1 88-28
. . . . .
=c2 88B-22(f), 88-24 =c1 88-28.1
. . . . .
=c2 88B-28 =c1 88-29
. . . . .
=c2 88B-4(c) =c1 88-30
. . . . .
=c2 88B-10 =te